Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2,272.25
Potentially hazardous food; discard; when.

(1) A food specified under subsections (1) and (2) of section 81-2,272.24 shall be discarded if such food:

(a) Exceeds either of the temperature and time combinations specified in subsection (1) of section 81-2,272.24, except time that the food is frozen;

(b) Is in a container or package that does not bear a date or day; or

(c) Is appropriately marked with a date or day that exceeds a temperature and time combination as specified in subsection (1) of section 81-2,272.24.

(2) Refrigerated, ready-to-eat, potentially hazardous food prepared in a food establishment and dispensed through a vending machine with an automatic shut-off control shall be discarded if it exceeds a temperature and time combination as specified in subsection (1) of section 81-2,272.24.

Laws 1997, LB 199, § 50;

Laws 2003, LB 250, § 16;

Laws 2007, LB74, § 9.